Washington statutes.
RCW 18.290.901

Implementation—2009 c 302.

The secretary of health may adopt such rules as authorized under RCW 18.290.020 to ensure that chapter 302, Laws of 2009 is implemented on its effective date.

[ 2009 c 302 s 16.]